Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 General Provisions

Law reviews.

For article, “Wheel of Fortune:
A Critique of the ‘Manifest Imbalance’ Requirement for Race-Conscious Affirmative Action under Title VII,” see 43 Ga. L. Rev. 993 (2009).

For article, “The Public Policy Exception to Employment At-Will: Time to Retire a Noble Warrior?,” see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 551 (2010).

45-20-1.
Purposes; principles.

It is the purpose of this article to establish in the state a system of personnel administration which will attract, select, and retain the best employees based on merit, free from coercive political influences, with incentives in the form of equal opportunities for all; which will provide technically competent and loyal personnel to render impartial service to the public at all times and to render such service according to the dictates of ethics and morality; and which will remove unnecessary and inefficient employees. It is specifically the intent of the General Assembly to promote this purpose by allowing agencies greater flexibility in personnel management so as to promote the overall effectiveness and efficiency of state government. To this end, and in accordance with Code Sections 45-20-2 and 45-20-6, all positions filled after July 1, 1996, shall be included in the unclassified service as defined in this article, except as provided in Code Section 15-11-69. It is also specifically the intent of the General Assembly that employees in the classified service prior to July 1, 1996, shall continue to be employees in the classified service so long as they remain in classified positions or as otherwise provided by law. It is further specifically the intent of the General Assembly that state government operate within a framework of consistent core personnel policies and practices across all state agencies and entities and that the state’s most valued resource, its employees, be managed in a manner to promote work force productivity and sound business practices.

In order to achieve these purposes, it is the policy of the state that agencies treat all employees in accordance with the following principles:

Assuring fair treatment of applicants and employees in all aspects of personnel administration without regard to race, color, national origin, sex, age, disability, religious creed, or political affiliations. This “fair treatment” principle includes compliance with all state and federal equal employment opportunity and nondiscrimination laws;

Recruiting, selecting, and advancing employees on the basis of their relative ability, knowledge, and skills, including open consideration of qualified applicants for initial employment;

Providing equitable and adequate compensation based on merit, performance, job value, and competitiveness within applicable labor markets;

Training employees, as needed, to assure high quality performance and to provide work force skills needed to maintain and advance the state’s goals and objectives;

Retaining employees on the basis of the adequacy of their performance, correcting inadequate performance where possible and appropriate, and separating employees whose performance is inadequate; and

Assuring that employees are protected against coercion for partisan political purposes and are prohibited from using their official authority for the purpose of interfering with or affecting the result of an election or nomination for office.

It shall be the responsibility of the Department of Administrative Services (DOAS) to perform the following functions:

Establish and maintain a state-wide system of pay ranges for all job classes;

Define job classes, establish associated minimum qualifications for those classes, and assign those classes to appropriate pay ranges;

Develop and maintain a common employment application form to be used by all applicants for state employment, which form may be supplemented as necessary by agencies in seeking information about agency job classes;

Develop, validate, or administer applicant screening devices when requested by agencies and when funding for such activities can be accomplished on a cost recovery basis;

In consultation with agencies, establish state-wide criteria for the implementation of rules and policies adopted by the State Personnel Board which agencies shall use in developing internal processes for classification, compensation, pay for performance, and performance management, including processes involved in defining job classes, establishing and applying associated minimum qualifications, assigning jobs to appropriate state-wide pay ranges, developing and applying applicant screening methods, and measuring worker effectiveness;

Audit agencies’ processes as referred to in paragraph (5) of this subsection and report findings annually to the Governor and the General Assembly in conjunction with an annual report on the overall status of the state work force. The DOAS shall not be required to distribute copies of the findings or annual report referred to in this paragraph to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the materials in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient; and

Maintain and make available to the public at large a state-wide central registry of employment vacancies and job announcements in state government as provided by agencies.

Subsection (c) of this Code section shall not apply to the legislative or judicial branches or to the board of regents.

Each agency shall develop a work force plan as a component of the strategic plan required by Code Section 45-12-177.

In the event agencies do not use a competitive civil service examination to fill some or all of their unclassified positions, it is expressly the intent of the General Assembly that appropriate consideration be given to veterans as defined under Article IV, Section III, Paragraph II of the Constitution of Georgia and Article 2 of Chapter 2 of this title in the filling of job vacancies in this state. Guidelines defining consideration practices shall be developed at the state level. Agencies shall specify agency policies and practices to implement appropriate consideration of military veterans in filling agency job vacancies.

The rules of statutory construction contained in Chapter 3 of Title 1, relating to general provisions concerning the construction of statutes, as now or hereafter amended, shall apply to this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 2501; Ga. L. 1975, p. 79, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1547, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 13; Ga. L. 1996, p. 684, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1258, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1377, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 31/SB 49; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 1/SB 230; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-52/HB 242.

Cross references.

Discrimination in public employment on basis of race, sex, age, and other factors, §

45-19-20

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, “state-wide” was substituted for “statewide” in paragraph (c)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

Law reviews.

For article advocating the inclusion of the Merit System under the Georgia Administrative Procedure Act, see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 269 (1965).

45-20-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Appointing authority” means the person or groups of persons authorized by law or delegated authority to make appointments to fill positions.

“Classified employee” means an employee who was in the classified service as of June 30, 1996, and who has remained in a classified position without a break in service since that date.

“Classified position” means a position that held classified status conferring rights of appeal, as set forth in Code Sections 45-20-8 and 45-20-9, as of June 30, 1996, and that subsequent to June 30, 1996, has not been held by an unclassified employee.

“Classified service” means employment in a classified position.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of administrative services provided for by Code Section 50-5-1.

“Department” and “agency” are synonymous and mean all separate and distinct divisions and subdivisions of state government whose heads are legally authorized to appoint employees to positions; but these terms shall not include authorities, public corporations, the legislative and judicial branches, and the board of regents. “Department” and “agency” shall also include an agency assigned to a department for administrative purposes and local departments of public health, county departments of family and children services, community service boards, and units of the Department of Defense with local employees.

“Department of Administrative Services” or “DOAS” means the department created by Code Section 50-5-1.

“Employment at will” means an employment relationship in which either party to the relationship may sever the relationship at any time for any reason other than an unlawful reason.

“Position” means a set of duties and responsibilities assigned or delegated by competent authority for performance by one person.

“Rules and regulations” means the governing provisions adopted by the State Personnel Board and approved by the Governor.

“State Personnel Board” and “board” are synonymous and mean the body authorized by Article IV, Section III, Paragraph I of the Constitution of Georgia.

“State Personnel Board policies” means those policies adopted by the board and approved by the Governor which describe the goals and objectives of the state personnel program and serve as a basis for the formulation and administration of the merit system rules and regulations.

“Unclassified employee” means an employee who is not a classified employee.

“Unclassified service” means employment at will and includes all employees except those in the classified service as defined in this Code section.

“Working test” or “working test period” means a probationary period of employment in a classified position during which the employee must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the appointing authority that he or she has the knowledge, ability, aptitude, and other necessary qualities to perform satisfactorily the duties of the position in which employed. The working test period shall apply to each promotion of a classified employee to a classified position. The commissioner may fix the length of the working test period for any job at not less than six months nor more than 18 months exclusive of any time in nonpay status; provided, however, that the length of the working test period for troopers of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety shall be 18 months.

“Working test employee” or “employee on working test” means a classified employee serving a working test period in the position in which he or she is employed; provided, however, that an employee serving a working test period following a promotion in the same department from a lower class in which he or she had successfully completed a working test period shall retain appeal rights in the lower class until he or she successfully completes the working test period in the job to which he or she has been promoted.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 2501; Ga. L. 1975, p. 79, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1547, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 830, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1251, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, §§ 34, 61; Ga. L. 1983, p. 459, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 1984, p. 467, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 547, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 469, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 575, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1252, § 5; Ga. L. 1990, p. 732, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 510, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 791, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1399, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 45; Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 9; Ga. L. 1995, p. 345, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1069, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 684, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1258, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1377, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 335, § 8/SB 435; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 2/SB 230; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2008, p. 335, § 8, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 2. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-3.
Duties and functions of State Personnel Board generally; compensation; quorum.

The State Personnel Board shall provide direction by which the state’s personnel policies shall be administered. The state’s personnel policies shall constitute a state merit system of personnel administration. The board shall hold regular meetings as needed for the proper discharge of its duties.

Members of the board shall receive no salary but shall receive the same expense allowance per day as that received by a member of the General Assembly for each day such member is attending meetings or performing official business for the board, plus reimbursement for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier or the legal mileage rate for the use of a personal automobile in connection with such attendance or official business.

Three members shall constitute a quorum. Only the votes of a majority of the members present shall be necessary for the transaction of any business or discharge of any duties of the State Personnel Board, provided there is a quorum.

It shall be the specific duty and function of the board:

To represent the public interest in the improvement of personnel administration in all state departments;

To determine appropriate human resource management goals and objectives and prescribe policies for their accomplishment;

At public hearings, to adopt and amend policies, rules, and regulations effectuating the state’s merit system. Notice of board meetings shall be released to all departments and agencies and shall be prominently posted at the office of the DOAS at least ten days prior to each board meeting;

Where the board deems appropriate, to review adverse personnel actions for employees of the classified service in accordance with the rules and regulations. All appeals determinations of the board shall be written and documented as to findings of fact, bases for decisions, and prescribed remedies;

To assure the administration of state and federal laws relating to state personnel administration; and

To promote public understanding of the purposes, policies, and practices of the state personnel system and to advise and assist the several state departments in fostering merit selection and securing the interest of institutions of learning and of civic, professional, and other organizations in the improvement of personnel standards under the state’s personnel system.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 79, § 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1547, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1026, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 427, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1997, p. 844, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1377, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 3/SB 230; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Cross references.

Creation and composition, etc., of State Personnel Board, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IV, Sec. III, Para. I.

Duty of State Personnel Board to formulate, establish, and maintain an employees’ suggestion and awards program, §

45-21-2

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-3.1.
Rule-making procedure.

At least 30 days prior to the date of a public hearing held by the board to consider the adoption of rules or regulations to effectuate this chapter, the commissioner shall transmit a notice containing an exact copy of the proposed rule or regulation to each member of the Senate Government Oversight Committee and the House Committee on Governmental Affairs. The notice shall provide a citation to the authority pursuant to which the proposed rule or regulation is to be adopted and, if it amends an existing rule or regulation, such existing rule or regulation shall be clearly identified. The notice shall also state the date, time, and place of the public hearing at which adoption of the proposed rule shall be considered.

If, prior to the date of the public hearing at which the proposed rule or regulation is to be considered for adoption, the chairperson of either legislative committee specified in subsection (a) of this Code section notifies the commissioner that the committee objects to the adoption of the proposed rule or regulation or has questions concerning the purpose, nature, or necessity of the proposed rule or regulation, it shall be the duty of the commissioner to consult with the committee prior to the board’s adoption of the proposed rule or regulation.

If the commissioner finds that the immediate adoption of a rule or regulation is necessary to secure or protect the interests of the DOAS, such rule or regulation may be adopted by the board on an emergency basis without following the procedures required by subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section. In that event, the commissioner shall present a resolution to the board for adoption declaring the existence of an emergency and explaining the basis for such declaration as a condition necessary to adopt a rule or regulation on an emergency basis. Any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to the authority of this subsection shall expire in not more than 120 days immediately following its adoption, but the adoption of an identical rule pursuant to the requirements of this Code section shall not be precluded.

Each rule or regulation adopted by the board shall become effective upon approval by the Governor. The commissioner shall immediately file an original and two copies of the rule or regulation in the office of the Secretary of State.

Rules or regulations filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section shall contain a citation to the authority pursuant to which the rules or regulations are adopted and, when existing rules or regulations are amended, the filings shall clearly identify the existing rules or regulations. The Secretary of State shall endorse on each filing the time and date of the filing and shall maintain a file of the rules and regulations for public inspection.

Rules and regulations filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to the requirements of subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section shall be published by the Secretary of State as a part of the rules of state agencies published by the Secretary of State pursuant to Code Section 50-13-7.

The courts shall take judicial notice of any rule which has become effective pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1250, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 45; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 45; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-4.
Duties and responsibilities of commissioner in administration of this chapter.

The duties and responsibilities of the commissioner in the administration of this chapter shall be:

To serve as executive secretary to the board, to attend meetings as directed by the board, and to provide such professional, technical, and other supportive assistance as may be required by the board in the performance of its duties;

To submit to the Governor the rules and regulations adopted by the board. Such rules and regulations when approved by the Governor shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding upon the state departments covered by this article and shall include provisions for the establishment and maintenance of classification and compensation plans, the conduct of examinations, appointments, promotions, transfers, demotions, appeals of classified employees, reports of performance, payroll certification, and other phases of personnel administration. Such rules and regulations shall define and prohibit improper political activity by any departmental employee of the State Personnel Board or any employee covered under the terms of this article and shall provide that there shall be no discrimination for or against any person or employee in any manner, to include, but not be limited to, hiring, discharge, compensation, benefits, terms or conditions of employment, promotion, job classification, transfer, privileges, or demotion because of political affiliation, religious affiliation, race, creed, national origin, sex, age between 40 and 70 years, or physical disability. Such rules and regulations shall conform to the minimum standards for merit systems of personnel administration as specified by those federal departments from which federal funds are obtained for use by the several state departments covered by this article. Compensation plans and modifications thereto promulgated under the rules and regulations of the commissioner shall become effective as adopted upon approval of the director of the Office of Planning and Budget;

To administer the adoption and compliance with rules and regulations of the board in all departments;

To appoint and prescribe the duties of DOAS staff as necessary to carry out the duties of this chapter;

To establish an annual budget covering administrative costs of performing the duties and responsibilities in accordance with this chapter, including the costs of administering such federal laws relating to personnel administration as the Governor may direct including the Intergovernmental Personnel Act of 1970, and to determine an equitable basis of allocating the annual costs among the several departments served by the DOAS in accordance with this chapter, with the amounts and rates for such services to be established in each general or amended appropriations Act;

To ensure compliance with all applicable state and federal statutes and regulations concerning discrimination in employment, personnel administration, and related matters; and

To cooperate with appointing authorities in the administration of this article in order to promote public service and establish conditions of service which will attract and retain employees of character and ability and to increase efficiency and economy in governmental departments by improving the methods of personnel administration with full recognition of the requirements and needs of management.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 79, § 5; Ga. L. 1979, p. 780, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 13; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1377, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 4/SB 230; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

U.S. Code.

The Intergovernmental Personnel Act of 1970, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 4701

et seq.

45-20-5.
[Reserved] Creation of Council for State Personnel Administration; membership; objectives; powers.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1975, p. 79, § 10; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1486, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 5/SB 230.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-6.
Composition of classified and unclassified service; effect of exclusion from classified service on eligibility for membership in Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia; working test period before obtaining rights of appeal.

Any officer or employee who occupied a classified position under the State Personnel Administration prior to July 1, 1996, or as provided in Code Section 15-11-69 shall remain in the classified service so long as such officer or employee shall remain in a classified position or as otherwise provided by law. Employees in the classified service shall have, upon completing a working test period, appeal rights as provided in Code Sections 45-20-8 and 45-20-9.

Reserved.

Exclusion from the classified service shall not exclude any employee, officer, or official from eligibility for membership or membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, provided that such employee, officer, or official is otherwise eligible for membership under Chapter 2 of Title 47.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that employees in the classified service be required to serve a working test period before they obtain rights of appeal and that the successful completion of this probationary period is part of the employment examination procedure. Each employee serving in a working test period shall be provided with management review by the appointing authority within ten calendar days of the date the employee has completed one-half of the working test period or as near to such date as is practicable. The management review shall include an evaluation of the employee’s progress and recommendations, if any, for corrective action. The provision of management review pursuant to this subsection is solely for the purpose of promoting efficient management and employee development and shall not be interpreted as granting any additional rights to a working test employee. The State Personnel Board shall be responsible for adopting and amending rules and regulations establishing the guidelines to be used by the appointing authority in completing the management review pursuant to this subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 79, § 6; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1547, § 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 279, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 684, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1258, § 4; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 6/SB 230; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-53/HB 242.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-7.
[Reserved] Employees in legislative branch authorized to become covered employees; procedure.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 698, § 1/SB 286, effective May 3, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1975, p. 79, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642, reenacted the reservation of this Code section without change.

45-20-8.
Procedure for adverse action against classified employees generally; appeals generally.

Classified employees who have successfully completed a working test period may be dismissed from employment or otherwise adversely affected as to compensation or employment status only if such action is taken in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board governing adverse actions and appeals for classified employees.

This article is not intended to create a property interest in the job, but rather to create only a procedure under which classified employees can be dismissed or otherwise adversely affected. The procedure adopted for dismissing a classified employee from employment or otherwise adversely affecting his or her compensation or employment status shall include, as a minimum, that the appointing authority must provide the classified employee with reasons for the action and an opportunity to file an appeal and request a hearing which may be held before either the board or an administrative law judge of the Office of State Administrative Hearings; provided, however, that the hearing may be held subsequent to the effective date of the dismissal or other purported adverse action; provided, further, that the right to appeal shall not apply when persons are dismissed or otherwise adversely affected as to compensation due to curtailment of funds or reduction in staff when such action is in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board.

No adverse action appealed to the State Personnel Board under the rules and regulations of the board, this article, or otherwise shall be considered invalid for failure to follow or comply with the rules and regulations of the board, this article, or any other requirement unless it is shown that the individual against whom the action has been taken has been substantially harmed by the procedural failure.

The decision of the board on an appeal as to whether a dismissal or other adverse action was in accordance with the rules and regulations prescribed by the State Personnel Board shall be binding upon the appointing authority. The board may modify the action of the appointing authority but may not increase the severity of such action on the employee. Such appointing authority shall promptly comply with such order as may be issued as a result of the appeal to the State Personnel Board. The decision of the board shall not limit the rights of the employee or the department to judicial review as to errors of law, and such decision shall be stayed pending other further appeal.

For purposes of this Code section and Code Section 45-20-9, administrative law judges appointed by the chief state administrative law judge pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 50 are authorized to hold hearings and otherwise assist the State Personnel Board in the resolution of appeals.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 79, § 7; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1547, § 3; Ga. L. 1979, p. 780, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1245, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 45; Ga. L. 1997, p. 844, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 7/SB 230; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”